Maryland, session 2026, HB0181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 21–330.3 and 21–330.4 of Article – Health – General of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 21–330.4 and 21–330.5, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
13–517.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(4) (i) “Facility” means an agency, an association, a corporation, a firm,
a partnership, or any other entity.
(ii) “Facility” does not include a grocery store or restaurant that is
subject to [§ 21–330.3] § 21–330.4 of the Health – General Article.
Article – Health – General
21–330.3.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MAIN FOOD ALLERGEN” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN 21 U.S.C. § 321.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO PREPACKAGED FOODS THAT ARE
SUBJECT TO FEDERAL LABELING REQUIREMENTS FOR MAIN FOOD ALLERGENS
UNDER 21 U.S.C. § 343.
(C) (1) A RESTAURANT SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE TO EACH CUSTOMER A
WRITTEN DISCLOSURE OF EACH MAIN FOOD ALLERGEN, IF ANY, THAT THE
RESTAURANT KNOWS OR REASONABLY SHOULD KNOW IS CONTAINED AS AN
INGREDIENT IN EACH MENU ITEM.
(2) THE WRITTEN DISCLOSURE SHALL USE THE COMMON NAMES OF
THE MAIN FOOD ALLERGEN OR STANDARDIZED PICTOGRAMS TO COMMUNICATE THE
PRESENCE OF A MAIN FOOD ALLERGEN.

HOUSE BILL 181 3
(D) A RESTAURANT MAY SATISFY THE DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENT
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION BY:
(1) INCLUDING A WRITTEN DISCLOSURE ON THE RESTAURANT’S
MENU;
(2) MAKING THE WRITTEN DISCLOSURE AVAILABLE IN A DIGITAL
FORMAT, INCLUDING THROUGH THE USE OF A QUICK RESPONSE (QR) CODE THAT
LINKS TO THE RESTAURANT’S DIGITAL MENU; OR
(3) MAKING THE WRITTEN DISCLOSURE AVAILABLE THROUGH:
(I) A SEPARATE ALLERGEN–SPECIFIC MENU;
(II) AN ALLERGEN CHART;
(III) AN ALLERGEN GRID;
(IV) AN ALLERGEN BOOKLET; OR
(V) ANY OTHER WRITTEN MATERIAL.
21–1214.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, any person who
violates any provision of Subtitle 3 of this title or any rule or regulation adopted under
Subtitle 3 of this title is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to:
(i) For a first offense, a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment
not exceeding 90 days, or both; and
(ii) For a second offense, a fine not exceeding $2,500 or imprisonment
not exceeding 1 year, or both.
(2) A person who violates § 21–330.1 of this title is not subject to paragraph
(1) of this subsection.
(b) In addition to any criminal penalties imposed under this section, a person who
violates any provision of Subtitle 3 of this title or any rule or regulation adopted under
Subtitle 3 of this title or any term, condition, or limitation of any license or registration
issued under Subtitle 3 of this title:
(1) Is liable for a civil penalty not exceeding $5,000, to be collected in a civil
action in the District Court for any county; and

HOUSE BILL 181
(2) May be enjoined from continuing the violation.
(c) Each day on which a violation occurs is a separate violation under this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.